California statutes. Corporations Code
(D) Confirming, pursuant to the procedure in subdivision (c), that, as of the most recently completed fiscal year of the partnership, it had a net worth equal to or exceeding fifteen million dollars ($15,000,000).

(3) For claims based upon acts, errors, or omissions arising out of the practice of architecture, a registered limited liability partnership or foreign limited liability partnership providing architectural services shall comply with one, or pursuant to subdivision (b) some combination, of the following:

(A) Maintaining a policy or
 policies of insurance against liability imposed on or against it by law for damages arising out of claims; however, the total aggregate limit of liability under the policy or policies of insurance for partnerships with five or fewer licensees rendering professional services on behalf of the partnership shall not be less than one million dollars ($1,000,000), and for partnerships with more than five licensees rendering professional services on behalf of the partnership, an additional one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) of liability coverage shall be obtained for each additional licensee; however, the total aggregate limit of liability under the policy or policies of insurance is not required to exceed five million dollars ($5,000,000). The policy or policies may be issued on a claims-made or occurrence basis, and shall cover: (i) in the case of a claims-made policy, claims initially asserted in
 the designated period, and (ii) in the case of an occurrence policy, occurrences during the designated period. For purposes of this subparagraph, “designated period” means a policy year or any other period designated in the policy that is not greater than 12 months. The impairment or exhaustion of the aggregate limit of liability by amounts paid under the policy in connection with the settlement, discharge, or defense of claims applicable to a designated period shall not require the partnership to acquire additional insurance coverage for that designated period. The policy or policies of insurance may be in a form reasonably available in the commercial insurance market and may be subject to those terms, conditions, exclusions, and endorsements that are typically contained in those policies. A policy or policies of insurance maintained pursuant to this subparagraph may be subject to a deductible or
 self-insured retention.

Upon the dissolution and winding up of the partnership, the partnership shall, with respect to any insurance policy or policies then maintained pursuant to this subparagraph, maintain or obtain an extended reporting period endorsement or equivalent provision in the maximum total aggregate limit of liability required to comply with this subparagraph for a minimum of three years if reasonably available from the insurer.

(B) Maintaining in trust or bank escrow, cash, bank certificates of deposit, United States Treasury obligations, bank letters of credit, or bonds of insurance or surety companies as security for payment of liabilities imposed by law for damages arising out of all claims; however, the maximum amount of security for partnerships with five or fewer licensees
 rendering professional services on behalf of the partnership shall not be less than one million dollars ($1,000,000), and for partnerships with more than five licensees rendering professional services on behalf of the partnership, an additional one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) of security shall be obtained for each additional licensee; however, the maximum amount of security is not required to exceed five million dollars ($5,000,000). The partnership remains in compliance with this section during a calendar year notwithstanding amounts paid during that calendar year from the accounts, funds, Treasury obligations, letters of credit, or bonds in defending, settling, or discharging claims of the type described in this paragraph, provided that the amount of those accounts, funds, Treasury obligations, letters of credit, or bonds was at least the amount specified in the preceding sentence
 as of the first business day of that calendar year. Notwithstanding the pendency of other claims against the partnership, a registered limited liability partnership or foreign limited liability partnership shall be deemed to be in compliance with this subparagraph as to a claim if within 30 days after the time that a claim is initially asserted through service of a summons, complaint, or comparable pleading in a judicial or administrative proceeding, the partnership has provided the required amount of security by designating and segregating funds in compliance with the requirements of this subparagraph.

(C) Unless the partnership has satisfied subparagraph (D), each partner of a registered limited liability partnership or foreign limited liability partnership providing architectural services, by virtue of that person’s status as a partner, thereby
 automatically guarantees payment of the difference between the maximum amount of security required for the partnership by this paragraph and the security otherwise provided in accordance with subparagraphs (A) and (B), provided that the aggregate amount paid by all partners under these guarantees shall not exceed the difference. Neither withdrawal by a partner nor the dissolution and winding up of the partnership shall affect the rights or obligations of a partner arising prior to withdrawal or dissolution and winding up, and the guarantee provided for in this subparagraph shall apply only to conduct that occurred prior to the withdrawal or dissolution and winding up. Nothing contained in this subparagraph shall affect or impair the rights or obligations of the partners among themselves, or the partnership, including, but not limited to, rights of contribution, subrogation, or indemnification.

(D) Confirming, pursuant to the procedure in subdivision (c), that, as of the most recently completed fiscal year of the partnership, it had a net worth equal to or exceeding ten million dollars ($10,000,000).

(4) For claims based upon acts, errors, or omissions arising out of the practice of engineering or the practice of land surveying, a registered limited liability partnership or foreign limited liability partnership providing engineering or land surveying services shall comply with one, or pursuant to subdivision (b) some combination, of the following:

(A) Maintaining a policy or policies of insurance against liability imposed on or against it by law for damages arising out of claims; however, the total
 aggregate limit of liability under the policy or policies of insurance for partnerships with five or fewer licensees rendering professional services on behalf of the partnership shall not be less than two million dollars ($2,000,000), and for partnerships with more than five licensees rendering professional services on behalf of the partnership, an additional one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) of liability coverage shall be obtained for each additional licensee; however, the total aggregate limit of liability under the policy or policies of insurance is not required to exceed five million dollars ($5,000,000). The policy or policies may be issued on a claims-made or occurrence basis, and shall cover: (i) in the case of a claims-made policy, claims initially asserted in the designated period, and (ii) in the case of an occurrence policy, occurrences during the designated period. For purposes of this
 subparagraph, “designated period” means a policy year or any other period designated in the policy that is not greater than 12 months. The impairment or exhaustion of the aggregate limit of liability by amounts paid under the policy in connection with the settlement, discharge, or defense of claims applicable to a designated period shall not require the partnership to acquire
 additional insurance coverage for that designated period. The policy or policies of insurance may be in a form reasonably available in the commercial insurance market and may be subject to those terms, conditions, exclusions, and endorsements that are typically contained in those policies. A policy or policies of insurance maintained pursuant to this subparagraph may be subject to a deductible or self-insured retention.

Upon the dissolution and winding up of the partnership, the partnership shall, with respect to any insurance policy or policies then maintained pursuant to this subparagraph, maintain or obtain an extended reporting period endorsement or equivalent provision in the maximum total aggregate limit of liability required to comply with this subparagraph for a minimum of three years if reasonably available from the insurer.

(B) Maintaining in trust or bank escrow, cash, bank certificates of deposit, United States Treasury obligations, bank letters of credit, or bonds of insurance or surety companies as security for payment of liabilities imposed by law for damages arising out of all claims; however, the maximum amount of security for partnerships with five or fewer licensees rendering professional services on behalf of the partnership shall not be less than two million dollars ($2,000,000), and for partnerships with more than five licensees rendering professional services on behalf of the partnership, an additional one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) of security shall be obtained for each additional licensee; however, the maximum amount of security is not required to exceed five million dollars ($5,000,000). The partnership remains in compliance with
 this section during a calendar year, notwithstanding amounts paid during that calendar year from the accounts, funds, Treasury obligations, letters of credit, or bonds in defending, settling, or discharging claims of the type described in this paragraph, provided that the amount of those accounts, funds, Treasury obligations, letters of credit, or bonds was at least the amount specified in the preceding sentence as of the first business day of that calendar year. Notwithstanding the pendency of other claims against the partnership, a registered limited liability partnership or foreign limited liability partnership shall be deemed to be in compliance with this subparagraph as to a claim if, within 30 days after the time that a claim is initially asserted through service of a summons, complaint, or comparable pleading in a judicial or administrative proceeding, the partnership has provided the
 required amount of security by designating and segregating funds in compliance with the requirements of this subparagraph.

(C) Unless the partnership has satisfied subparagraph (D), each partner of a registered limited liability partnership or foreign limited liability partnership providing engineering services or land surveying services, by virtue of that person’s status as a partner, thereby automatically guarantees payment of the difference between the maximum amount of security required for the partnership by this paragraph and the security otherwise provided in accordance with subparagraphs (A) and (B), provided that the aggregate amount paid by all partners under these guarantees shall not exceed the difference. Neither withdrawal by a partner nor the dissolution and winding up of the partnership shall affect the rights or obligations
 of a partner arising prior to withdrawal or dissolution and winding up, and the guarantee provided for in this subparagraph shall apply only to conduct that occurred prior to the withdrawal or dissolution and winding up. Nothing contained in this subparagraph shall affect or impair the rights or obligations of the partners among themselves, or the partnership, including, but not limited to, rights of contribution, subrogation, or indemnification.

(D) Confirming, pursuant to the procedure in subdivision (c), that, as of the most recently completed fiscal year of the partnership, it had a net worth equal to or exceeding ten million dollars ($10,000,000).

(b) For purposes of satisfying the security requirements of this section, a registered limited liability partnership or foreign
 limited liability partnership may aggregate the security provided by it pursuant to subparagraphs (A), (B), (C), and (D) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), subparagraphs (A), (B), (C), and (D) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a), subparagraphs (A), (B), (C), and (D) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (a), or subparagraphs (A), (B), (C), and (D) of paragraph (4) of subdivision (a), as the case may be. Any registered limited liability partnership or foreign limited liability partnership intending to comply with the alternative security provisions set forth in subparagraph (D) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), subparagraph (D) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a), subparagraph (D) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (a), or subparagraph (D) of paragraph (4) of subdivision (a), shall furnish the following information to the Secretary of State’s office, in the manner prescribed in, and accompanied by all
 information required by, the applicable section:TRANSMITTAL FORM FOR EVIDENCING COMPLIANCE
WITH SECTION 16956(a)(1)(D), SECTION 16956(a)(2)(D),
SECTION 16956(a)(3)(D), OR SECTION 16956(a)(4)(D) OF THE CALIFORNIA CORPORATIONS CODE
The undersigned hereby confirms
 the following:1.Name of registered or foreign limited liability partnership2.Jurisdiction where partnership is organized3.Address
 of principal office4.The registered or foreign limited liability partnership chooses
to satisfy the requirements of Section 16956 by confirming,
pursuant to Section 16956(a)(1)(D), 16956(a)(2)(D),
16956(a)(3)(D), or 16956(a)(4)(D) and pursuant to Section 16956(c), 
that, as of the most recently completed fiscal year, the partnership had
a net worth equal to or exceeding ten million dollars
($10,000,000), in the case of a partnership providing
accountancy services, fifteen million dollars ($15,000,000),
in the case of a partnership providing legal services, or
ten million dollars ($10,000,000), in the case of a partnership
providing
 architectural services, engineering services, or land surveying services.
5.Title of authorized person executing this form6.Signature of authorized person executing this form(c) Pursuant to subparagraph (D) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), subparagraph (D)
 of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a), subparagraph (D) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (a), or subparagraph (D) of paragraph (4) of subdivision (a), a registered limited liability partnership or foreign limited liability partnership may satisfy the requirements of this section by confirming that, as of the last day of its most recently completed fiscal year, it had a net worth equal to or exceeding the amount required. In order to comply with this alternative method of meeting the requirements established in this section, a registered limited liability partnership or foreign limited liability partnership shall file an annual confirmation with the Secretary of State’s office, signed by an authorized member of the registered limited liability partnership or foreign limited liability partnership, accompanied by a transmittal form as prescribed by subdivision (b). In order to be current in a given year,
 the partnership form for confirming compliance with the optional security requirement shall be on file within four months of the completion of the fiscal year and, upon being filed, shall constitute full compliance with the financial security requirements for purposes of this section as of the beginning of the fiscal year. A confirmation filed during any particular fiscal year shall continue to be effective for the first four months of the next succeeding fiscal year.

(d) Neither the existence of the requirements of subdivision (a) nor the extent of the registered limited liability partnership’s or foreign limited liability partnership’s compliance with the alternative requirements in this section shall be admissible in court or in any way be made known to a jury or other trier of fact in determining an issue of liability for, or to the
 extent of, the damages in question.

(e) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, if a
 registered limited liability partnership or foreign limited liability partnership is otherwise in compliance with the terms of this section at the time that a bankruptcy or other insolvency proceeding is commenced with respect to the registered limited liability partnership or foreign limited liability partnership, it shall be deemed to be in compliance with this section during the pendency of the proceeding. A registered limited liability partnership that has been the subject of a proceeding and that conducts business after the proceeding ends shall thereafter comply with paragraph (1), (2), (3), or (4) of subdivision (a), in order to obtain the limitations on liability afforded by subdivision (c) of Section 16306.

(f) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2034, and as of that date is
 repealed.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 150, Sec. 7) by Stats. 2024, Ch. 361, Sec. 12.   (AB 1862)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2034, by its own provisions.    See later operative version, as amended by Sec. 13 Stats. 2024, Ch. 361.)
-------------------------------------------

16956.

(a) At the time of registration pursuant to Section 16953, in the case of a registered limited liability partnership, and Section 16959, in the case of a foreign limited liability partnership, and at all times during which those partnerships shall transact intrastate business, every registered limited liability partnership and foreign limited liability partnership, as the case may be, shall be required to provide security for claims against it as follows:

(1) For claims based upon acts, errors, or omissions arising out of the practice of public accountancy, a registered limited liability partnership or foreign limited liability partnership providing accountancy services shall comply with
 one, or pursuant to subdivision (b) some combination, of the following:

(A) Maintaining a policy or policies of insurance against liability imposed on or against it by law for damages arising out of claims; however, the total aggregate limit of liability under the policy or policies of insurance for partnerships with five or fewer licensed persons shall not be less than one million dollars ($1,000,000), and for partnerships with more than five licensees rendering professional services on behalf of the partnership, an additional one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) of insurance shall be obtained for each additional licensee; however, the maximum amount of insurance is not required to exceed five million dollars ($5,000,000) in any one designated period, less amounts paid in defending, settling, or discharging claims as set forth in this subparagraph.
 The policy or policies may be issued on a claims-made or occurrence basis, and shall cover: (i) in the case of a claims-made policy, claims initially asserted in the designated period, and (ii) in the case of an occurrence policy, occurrences during the designated period. For purposes of this subparagraph, “designated period” means a policy year or any other period designated in the policy that is not greater than 12 months. The impairment or exhaustion of the aggregate limit of liability by amounts paid under the policy in connection with the settlement, discharge, or defense of claims applicable to a designated period shall not require the partnership to acquire additional insurance coverage for that designated period. The policy or policies of insurance may be in a form reasonably available in the commercial insurance market and may be subject to those terms, conditions, exclusions, and
 endorsements that are typically contained in those policies. A policy or policies of insurance maintained pursuant to this subparagraph may be subject to a deductible or self-insured retention.

Upon the dissolution and winding up of the partnership, the partnership shall, with respect to any insurance policy or policies then maintained pursuant to this subparagraph, maintain or obtain an extended reporting period endorsement or equivalent provision in the maximum total aggregate limit of liability required to comply with this subparagraph for a minimum of three years if reasonably available from the insurer.

(B) Maintaining in trust or bank escrow, cash, bank certificates of deposit, United States Treasury obligations, bank letters of credit, or bonds of insurance or surety companies as security for payment
 of liabilities imposed by law for damages arising out of all claims; however, the maximum amount of security for partnerships with five or fewer licensed persons shall not be less than one million dollars ($1,000,000), and for partnerships with more than five licensees rendering professional services on behalf of the partnership, an additional one hundred thousand dollars
 ($100,000) of security shall be obtained for each additional licensee; however, the maximum amount of security is not required to exceed five million dollars ($5,000,000). The partnership remains in compliance with this section during a calendar year notwithstanding amounts paid during that calendar year from the accounts, funds, Treasury obligations, letters of credit, or bonds in defending, settling, or discharging claims of the type described in this paragraph, provided that the amount of those accounts, funds, Treasury obligations, letters of credit, or bonds was at least the amount specified in the preceding sentence as of the first business day of that calendar year. Notwithstanding the pendency of other claims against the partnership, a registered limited liability partnership or foreign limited liability partnership shall be deemed to be in compliance with this subparagraph as to a
 claim if within 30 days after the time that a claim is initially asserted through service of a summons, complaint, or comparable pleading in a judicial or administrative proceeding, the partnership has provided the required amount of security by designating and segregating funds in compliance with the requirements of this subparagraph.

(C) Unless the partnership has satisfied subparagraph (D), each partner of a registered limited liability partnership or foreign limited liability partnership providing accountancy services, by virtue of that person’s status as a partner, thereby automatically guarantees payment of the difference between the maximum amount of security required for the partnership by this paragraph and the security otherwise provided in accordance with subparagraphs (A) and (B), provided that the aggregate amount paid by
 all partners under these guarantees shall not exceed the difference. Neither withdrawal by a partner nor the dissolution and winding up of the partnership shall affect the rights or obligations of a partner arising prior to withdrawal or dissolution and winding up, and the guarantee provided for in this subparagraph shall apply only to conduct that occurred prior to the withdrawal or dissolution and winding up. Nothing contained in this subparagraph shall affect or impair the rights or obligations of the partners among themselves, or the partnership, including, but not limited to, rights of contribution, subrogation, or indemnification.

(D) Confirming, pursuant to the procedure in subdivision (c), that, as of the most recently completed fiscal year of the partnership, it had a net worth equal to or exceeding ten million dollars
 ($10,000,000).

(2) For claims based upon acts, errors, or omissions arising out of the practice of law, a registered limited liability partnership or foreign limited liability partnership providing legal services shall comply with one, or pursuant to subdivision (b) some combination, of the following:

(A) Each registered limited liability partnership or foreign limited liability partnership providing legal services shall maintain a policy or policies of insurance against liability imposed on or against it by law for damages arising out of claims; however, the total aggregate limit of liability under the policy or policies of insurance for partnerships with five or fewer licensed persons shall not be less than one million dollars ($1,000,000), and for partnerships with more than
 five licensees rendering professional services on behalf of the partnership, an additional one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) of insurance shall be obtained for each additional licensee; however, the maximum amount of insurance is not required to exceed seven million five hundred thousand dollars ($7,500,000) in any one designated period, less amounts paid in defending, settling, or discharging claims as set forth in this subparagraph. The policy or policies may be issued on a claims-made or occurrence basis, and shall cover (i) in the case of a claims-made policy, claims initially asserted in the designated period, and (ii) in the case of an occurrence policy, occurrences during the designated period. For purposes of this subparagraph, “designated period” means a policy year or any other period designated in the policy that is not greater than 12 months. The impairment or exhaustion of the
 aggregate limit of liability by amounts paid under the policy in connection with the settlement, discharge, or defense of claims applicable to a designated period shall not require the partnership to acquire additional insurance coverage for that designated period. The policy or policies of insurance may be in a form reasonably available in the commercial insurance market and may be subject to those terms, conditions, exclusions, and endorsements that are typically contained in those policies. A policy or policies of insurance maintained pursuant to this subparagraph may be subject to a deductible or self-insured retention.

Upon the dissolution and winding up of the partnership, the partnership shall, with respect to any insurance policy or policies then maintained pursuant to this subparagraph, maintain or obtain an extended reporting period endorsement
 or equivalent provision in the maximum total aggregate limit of liability required to comply with this subparagraph for a minimum of three years if reasonably available from the insurer.

(B) Each registered limited liability partnership or foreign limited liability partnership providing legal services shall maintain in trust or bank escrow, cash, bank certificates of deposit, United States Treasury obligations, bank letters of credit, or bonds of insurance or surety companies as security for payment of liabilities imposed by law for damages arising out of all claims; however, the maximum amount of security for partnerships with five or fewer licensed persons shall not be less than one million dollars ($1,000,000), and for partnerships with more than five licensees rendering professional services on behalf of the partnership, an additional
 one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) of security shall be obtained for each additional licensee; however, the maximum amount of security is not required to exceed seven million five hundred thousand dollars ($7,500,000). The partnership remains in compliance with this section during a calendar year notwithstanding amounts paid during that calendar year from the accounts, funds, Treasury obligations, letters of credit, or bonds in defending, settling, or discharging claims of the type described in this paragraph, provided that the amount of those accounts, funds, Treasury obligations, letters of credit, or bonds was at least the amount specified in the preceding sentence as of the first business day of that calendar year. Notwithstanding the pendency of other claims against the partnership, a registered limited liability partnership or foreign limited liability partnership shall be deemed to be
 in compliance with this subparagraph as to a claim if within 30 days after the time that a claim is initially asserted through service of a summons, complaint, or comparable pleading in a judicial or administrative proceeding, the partnership has provided the required amount of security by designating and segregating funds in compliance with the requirement of this subparagraph.

(C) Unless the partnership has satisfied the requirements of subparagraph (D), each partner of a registered limited liability partnership or foreign limited liability partnership providing legal services, by virtue of that person’s status as a partner, thereby automatically guarantees payment of the difference between the maximum amount of security required for the partnership by this paragraph and the security otherwise provided in accordance with the provisions of
 subparagraphs (A) and (B), provided that the aggregate amount paid by all partners under these guarantees shall not exceed the difference. Neither withdrawal by a partner nor the dissolution and winding up of the partnership shall affect the rights or obligations of a partner arising prior to withdrawal or dissolution and winding up, and the guarantee provided for in this subparagraph shall apply only to conduct that occurred prior to the withdrawal or dissolution and winding up. Nothing contained in this subparagraph shall affect or impair the rights or obligations of the partners among themselves, or the partnership, including, but not limited to, rights of contribution, subrogation, or indemnification.

(D) Confirming, pursuant to the procedure in subdivision (c), that, as of the most recently completed fiscal year of the partnership,
 it had a net worth equal to or exceeding fifteen million dollars ($15,000,000).

(b) For purposes of satisfying the security requirements of this section, a registered limited liability partnership or foreign limited liability partnership may aggregate the security provided by it pursuant to subparagraphs (A), (B), (C), and (D) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) or subparagraphs (A), (B), (C), and (D) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) as the case may be. Any registered limited liability partnership or foreign limited liability partnership intending to comply with the alternative security provisions set forth in subparagraph (D) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) or subparagraph (D) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) shall furnish the following information to the Secretary of State’s office, in the manner prescribed in, and
 accompanied by all information required by, the applicable section:TRANSMITTAL FORM FOR EVIDENCING COMPLIANCE
WITH SECTION 16956(a)(1)(D) or SECTION 16956(a)(2)(D) OF THE CALIFORNIA
CORPORATIONS CODEThe undersigned hereby confirms the following:1.Name of registered or foreign limited liability partnership2.Jurisdiction where partnership is organized3.Address of principal office4.The registered or foreign limited liability partnership chooses
to satisfy the requirements of Section 16956 by confirming,
pursuant to Section 16956(a)(1)(D) or 16956(a)(2)(D) and pursuant to Section 16956(c), that, as of
the most recently completed fiscal year, the partnership had
a net worth equal to or exceeding ten million dollars
($10,000,000), in the case of a partnership providing
accountancy services or fifteen million dollars ($15,000,000)
in the case of a partnership providing legal services.
5.Title of authorized person executing this form6.Signature of authorized person executing this form(c) Pursuant to subparagraph (D) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) or subparagraph (D) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a), a registered limited liability partnership or foreign limited liability partnership may satisfy the requirements of this section by confirming that, as
 of the last day of its most recently completed fiscal year, it had a net worth equal to or exceeding the amount required. In order to comply with this alternative method of meeting the requirements established in this section, a registered limited liability partnership or foreign limited liability partnership shall file an annual confirmation with the Secretary of State’s office, signed by an authorized member of the registered limited liability partnership or foreign limited liability partnership, accompanied by a transmittal form as prescribed by subdivision (b). In order to be current in a given year, the partnership form for confirming compliance with the optional security requirement shall be on file within four months of the completion of the fiscal year and, upon being filed, shall constitute full compliance with the financial security requirements for purposes of this section as of the
 beginning of the fiscal year. A confirmation filed during any particular fiscal year shall continue to be effective for the first four months of the next succeeding fiscal year.

(d) Neither the existence of the requirements of subdivision (a) nor the extent of the registered limited liability partnership’s or foreign limited liability partnership’s compliance with the alternative requirements in this section shall be admissible in court or in any way be made known to a jury or other trier of fact in determining an issue of liability for, or to the extent of, the damages in question.

(e) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, if a registered limited liability partnership or foreign limited liability partnership is otherwise in compliance with the terms of this section at
 the time that a bankruptcy or other insolvency proceeding is commenced with respect to the registered limited liability partnership or foreign limited liability partnership, it shall be deemed to be in compliance with this section during the pendency of the proceeding. A registered limited liability partnership that has been the subject of a proceeding and that conducts business after the proceeding ends shall thereafter comply with paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (a), in order to obtain the limitations on liability afforded by subdivision (c) of Section 16306.

(f) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2034.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 150, Sec. 8) by Stats. 2024, Ch. 361, Sec. 13.   (AB 1862)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Section operative January 1, 2034, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

16957.

(a) No distribution shall be made by a registered limited liability partnership if, after giving effect to the distribution:

(1) The registered limited liability partnership would not be able to pay its debts as they become due in the usual course of business.

(2) The registered limited liability partnership’s total assets would be less than the sum of its total liabilities plus the amount that would be needed, if the
 registered limited liability partnership were to be dissolved at the time of the distribution, to satisfy the preferential rights of other partners upon dissolution that are superior to the rights of the partners receiving the distribution.

(b) A cause of action with respect to an obligation to return a distribution is extinguished unless the action is brought within four years after the distribution is made.

(c) A distribution for purposes of this section means the transfer of money or property by a registered limited liability partnership to its partners without consideration.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1003, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

16958.

(a) (1) The laws of the jurisdiction under which a foreign limited liability partnership is organized shall govern its organization and internal affairs and the liability and authority of its partners, subject to compliance with Section 16956, and (2) a foreign limited liability partnership may not be denied registration by reason of any difference between those laws and the laws of this state.

(b) The name of a foreign limited liability partnership
 transacting intrastate business in this state shall contain the words “Registered Limited Liability Partnership” or “Limited Liability Partnership” or one of the abbreviations “L.L.P.,” “LLP,” “R.L.L.P.,” or “RLLP,” or such other similar words or abbreviations as may be required or authorized by the laws of the jurisdiction of formation of the foreign limited liability partnership, as the last words or letters of its name.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1003, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

16959.

(a) (1) Before transacting intrastate business in this state, a foreign limited liability partnership shall comply with all statutory and administrative registration or filing requirements of the state board, commission, or agency that prescribes the rules and regulations governing a particular profession in which the partnership proposes to be engaged, pursuant to the applicable provisions of the Business and Professions Code relating to the profession or applicable rules adopted by the governing board. A foreign limited liability partnership that transacts intrastate business in this state shall within 30 days after the effective date of the act enacting this section or the date on which the foreign limited liability
 partnership first transacts intrastate business in this state, whichever is later, register with the Secretary of State by submitting to the Secretary of State an application for registration as a foreign limited liability partnership, signed by a person with authority to do so under the laws of the jurisdiction of formation of the foreign limited liability partnership, stating the name of the partnership, the street address of its principal office, the mailing address of the principal office if different from the street address, the name and street address of its agent for service of process in this state in accordance with subdivision (a) of Section 16309, a brief statement of the business in which the partnership engages, and any other matters that the partnership determines to include.

(2) Annexed to the application for registration shall be a certificate
 from an authorized public official of the foreign limited liability partnership’s jurisdiction of organization to the effect that the foreign limited liability partnership is in good standing in that jurisdiction, if the laws of that jurisdiction permit the issuance of those certificates, or, in the alternative, a statement by the foreign limited liability partnership that the laws of its jurisdiction of organization do not permit the issuance of those certificates.

(b) The registration shall be accompanied by a fee as set forth in subdivision (b) of Section 12189 of the Government Code.

(c) If the Secretary of State finds that an application for registration conforms to law and all requisite fees have been paid, the Secretary of State shall issue a certificate of registration to transact
 intrastate business in this state.

(d) The Secretary of State may cancel the filing of the registration if a check or other remittance accepted in payment of the filing fee is not paid upon presentation. Within 90 days of receiving written notification that the item presented for payment has not been honored for payment, the Secretary of State shall give a first written notice of the applicability of this section to the agent for service of process or to the person submitting the instrument. Thereafter, if the amount has not been paid by cashier’s check or equivalent, the Secretary of State shall give a second written notice of cancellation and the cancellation shall thereupon be effective. The second notice shall be given 20 days or more after the first notice.

(e) A